District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.37

Amendment of charter; procedure.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 639b
Feb. 12, 1931, 46 Stat. 1089, ch. 120
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-201.37.
1981 Ed., § 29-238.
1973 Ed., § 29-238.